New York, session 2025-2026, S2338.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 110 of the agriculture and markets 2 law, as added by section 5 of part T of chapter 59 of the laws of 2010, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 2. Municipalities may exempt from [their] the licensing fees imposed 5 by subdivision one of this section and the surcharge imposed by subdivi- 6 sion three of this section any guide dog, hearing dog, service dog, war 7 dog, working search dog, detection dog, police work dog or therapy dog. 8 Each copy of any license for such dogs shall be conspicuously marked 9 "Guide Dog", "Hearing Dog", "Service Dog", "Working Search Dog", "War 10 Dog", "Detection Dog", "Police Work Dog", or "Therapy Dog", as may be 11 appropriate, by the clerk or authorized dog control officer. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 13 ing the date on which it shall become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05423-01-5